Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Chapter 14 Veterans

Cross references. —

As to Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, see §§

3-6-101

to

3-6-119

.

As to designation of November 11 as Veterans' Day, see §

8-4-101

.

As to exemptions from taxation applicable to veterans, see §

39-13-105

.

§ 19-14-101.
Burial of indigents.

The board of county commissioners of each county shall provide for the preparation of the body and transmittal to and burial in the veteran’s cemetery of any other than a dishonorably discharged veteran of the armed forces of the United States who served on behalf of the United States in any war or conflict as defined in section 101, title 38, United States Code and who dies leaving insufficient funds to defray the necessary funeral expenses. The amount expended for transporting the body shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500.00). The amount paid under this section for burial shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00). Each board shall account for the county expenses incurred under this subsection during a fiscal year. By August 1 of each year, a county may request reimbursement by the department of family services for the expenses incurred under this subsection for the preceding fiscal year. The department of family services shall reimburse the expenses in accordance with W.S. 35-1-428(c).

Before assuming charge and expense for preparation and transmittal of the body and burial, each board of county commissioners shall first determine according to procedures they establish that the deceased veteran of the armed forces of the United States whose body they are called upon to bury served in the armed forces of the United States during World War II or any preceding war in which the United States was a party or during the Korean or Vietnam conflicts, was other than dishonorably discharged and died in the county leaving insufficient means to defray the necessary funeral expenses.

The county commissioners of each county, shall:

Keep a complete record of all the facts relating to any veteran of the armed forces of the United States who is buried in accordance with this section; and

Draw a warrant on the treasurer of their county for the payment of the expenses out of the general funds of the county.

History.

Laws 1886, ch. 26, §§ 1 to 3; R.S. 1887, §§ 1966 to 1968; 1899, §§ 1255 to 1257; C.S. 1910, §§ 1338 to 1340; 1920, §§ 1587 to 1589; Laws 1921, ch. 111, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 100-301 to 100-303; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-401 to 30-403; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-116 to 19-118; Laws 1977, ch. 138, §§ 1; 1985, ch. 79, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-14-101

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2010, ch. 74, § 1; 2021 ch. 33, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to taking unclaimed bodies of war veterans for scientific research, see §

35-4-602

.

As to cemeteries and burials generally, see §§

35-8-101

to

35-8-407

.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), substituted “on behalf of the United States in any war or conflict as defined in section 101, title 38, United States Code” for “during World War II or any preceding war or the Korean or Vietnam conflicts on behalf of the United States.”

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, added the third through sixth sentences in (a).

Applicability. —

Laws 2021, ch. 33, § 2, provides: “This act shall only apply to expenses incurred under
W.S. 18-3-504(c),
19-14-101(a) and
42-2-103(c) on or after the effective date of this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Federal statute as to disposition of personal property of veteran dying in Veterans' Administration facility without spouse or heirs, 36 A.L.R.2d 725.

§ 19-14-102.
Interview preference in public departments; qualifications.

In every public department veterans or surviving spouses shall have a preference prior to the interview process. Age or other impairment which does not in fact materially incapacitate shall not disqualify them from receiving preference if they possess the business capacity, competency, education or other qualifications for discharge of the duties required. If the disabilities do not materially interfere with performance of the duties, the disabled veterans shall be given preference over able-bodied veterans.

Each official or person having power of appointment in the public service is charged with the faithful compliance with the duties herein prescribed.

Whenever a veteran or surviving spouse applies for initial employment with a public department that uses a numerical scoring system prior to its interview process, the veteran or surviving spouse shall be allowed a five percent (5%) advantage over any nonveteran. A veteran that has a service connected disability of ten percent (10%) or more shall be given a ten percent (10%) advantage. Whenever a veteran or surviving spouse applies for initial employment with a public department and no numerical scoring system is used prior to the interview process, the veteran or surviving spouse shall be given an advantage over nonveteran candidates that reasonably approximates the advantage given to veterans or surviving spouses applying for initial employment with a public department that uses a numerical scoring system in the interview process pursuant to this subsection. No preference under this section shall be given to a veteran currently employed by a public department.

As used in this section:

“Public department” includes the state of Wyoming or any of its branches, agencies, municipalities, counties, school districts, political subdivisions, special districts, community college districts and the University of Wyoming;

“Veteran” means a member of the United States military establishment honorably discharged from service who has been a resident of the state of Wyoming for one (1) year or more at any time prior to the date when the veteran applies for employment;

“Surviving spouse” means a person who was married to a veteran at the time of the veteran’s death and who receives survivor benefits from the federal government based on the veteran’s military service.

History.

Laws 1890, ch. 44, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1899, §§ 2636, 2637; C.S. 1910, §§ 291, 292; 1920, §§ 350, 351; R.S. 1931, §§ 100-101, 100-102; Laws 1945, ch. 46, § 1; 1945, ch. 54; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-201 to 30-203; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-119 to 19-121; Laws 1969, ch. 3, §§ 1, 2; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-6-102

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4; 2017 ch. 195, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For provision giving preference to veterans in hiring of municipal policemen and firemen, see §

15-5-107

.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a) deleted language specifying veterans of war under
section 101, title 38, of the USC, deleted language requiring a veteran to be a resident of Wyoming for one year, and added language specifying that preference will be given to veterans prior to the interview process; rewrote (c); and added (d).

Only employee denied position may file grievance. —

A department of administration and information employee could not file a grievance against the department of transportation after he was not hired for a transportation department position. The personnel administrator correctly interpreted and applied the Personnel Rules when he denied both the grievance and the request for the formation of a grievance committee. Pinther v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 866 P.2d 1300,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1994).

No preference for veteran seeking transfer. —

The veteran's preference contained in subsection (a) does not extend to a qualified veteran seeking a transfer to another state agency. The legislature intended for this section to give qualified veterans the benefit of a competitive advantage in the state hiring process. Giving a preference to veterans who are pursuing a transfer or promotion within the state government in no way advances this legislative process. Pinther v. State, Dep't of Admin. & Info., 866 P.2d 1300,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1994).

Quoted

in

Martinez v. State, 218 F.3d 1133, 2000 U.S. App. LEXIS 17319 (10th Cir. 2000).

Law reviews. —

See comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” 5 Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Reemployment of discharged servicemen, 29 ALR2d 1279.

Rights of noncivil service public employees, with respect to discharge or dismissal, under state veterans' tenure statutes, 58 ALR2d 960.

Applicability of doctrine of laches to bar veterans' re-employment claims where there is delay by government officials and agencies in rendering veterans' re-employment aid pursuant to 38 USC § 2025 [omitted], 53 ALR Fed 451.

Attorneys' fee awards under 5 USCS § 7701(g), which allows award of attorneys' fees to prevailing employee for appeal to merit systems protection board from adverse employment decision. 143 ALR Fed 145.

§ 19-14-103.
Honorably discharged considered to be sui juris as to G.I. bill of rights.

Each person eighteen (18) years of age who receives an honorable discharge from the armed service of the United States after having served at least three (3) months in the armed services, shall be considered as having attained the age of majority in connection with all property and contractual rights and liabilities upon his obtaining the discharge. This section is applicable only to provisions of Public Law 346, statutes-at-large Seventy-Eighth Congress, 1944, second session.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 109, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 30-208; W.S. 1957, § 19-122; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-6-103

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

The act of June 22, 1944, ch. 268, 58 Stat. 284, entitled an act “to provide federal government aid for the readjustment in civilian life of returning world war veterans” and generally known as the “G.I. Bill,” referred to in the text, was repealed by Pub. L. 85-827, § 14 (87), Sept. 2, 1958, 72 Stat. 1273. For similar provisions, see 38 U.S.C. §§ 1801 et seq.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity and effect of side agreement affecting cost of property covered by veterans' loan under Servicemen's Readjustment Act, 19 ALR2d 836.

Validity, construction, and application of 38 U.S.C. § 211(a) [see 38 U.S.C. § 1985] precluding judicial or other review of administrative decisions on veterans' benefits, 18 ALR Fed 915.

§ 19-14-104.
Recordation of discharges.

Each Wyoming county clerk shall record in his office without charge of any fee a certificate of discharge or other separation from service documents from any person who has served in the United States armed forces at any time, and who has been honorably discharged or relieved from active service.

All documents filed under this section on and after July 1, 2003, shall be kept confidential and shall be available only to the discharged person, that person’s authorized agent, that person’s dependents, the veterans’ service officer, the Wyoming veteran’s commission, a peace officer or by court order.

Any person who has recorded a certificate of discharge or other separation from service documents prior to July 1, 2003 may request that all filed documents which have not been commingled be transferred or rerecorded without charge of any fee and kept as a confidential file pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

A county clerk shall, to the greatest extent practical, take appropriate protective actions in accordance with any limitations determined necessary by him with regard to records that were filed with or placed in storage by a county clerk prior to July 1, 2003.

Ten (10) years after the death of the veteran, or, if the date of death of the veteran is unknown, one hundred (100) years from the time of discharge or release from active service, the county clerk may transfer the documents filed under this section to a public archive.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 103, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 30-209; W.S. 1957, § 19-123; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-6-104

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4; 2003, ch. 95, § 1; ch. 202, § 3; 2009, ch. 168, § 206.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “and ex officio register of deeds” following “county clerk” in (a) and (d).

§ 19-14-105.
Use of pensions for support in state institutions prohibited; exception; penalty.

No state institution shall take any part of the pension of any war veteran for his support or maintenance except, in the case of a veteran who is or who may be confined in any charitable institution of Wyoming. The pension of the veteran in excess of four hundred twenty dollars ($420.00) per month may be used for support and maintenance if the veteran has no dependents. Any officer of a state institution or other person violating the provisions of this section upon conviction shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00) nor more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for each offense.

History.

Laws 1903, ch. 52, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1910, § 5983; C.S. 1920, § 7281; Laws 1927, ch. 69, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 32-826; C.S. 1945, § 30-212; W.S. 1957, § 19-124; Laws 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-6-105

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.

§ 19-14-106.
Free tuition for education of war orphans and veterans; definitions.

As used in this section:

“Eligible person” includes the surviving spouse and dependent of any person who was a resident of Wyoming at the time of entering into active state service or active service with the military forces of the United States; and

Whose death was service connected, as defined in 81 Stat. 181, 38 U.S.C. 101, or is listed officially in the military records of the United States as being a prisoner of war or missing in action as a result of active state service or active service with the military forces of the United States; or

Who was honorably discharged from the military forces of the United States and thereafter died of an injury or disease incurred while in active state service or active service with such military forces, being a resident at the time of death.

“Vietnam veteran” means any person who:

Was in active service with the military forces of the United States and received a Vietnam service medal between August 5, 1964 to May 7, 1975; and

Received a discharge from the military forces of the United States other than dishonorably; and

Has been a resident of Wyoming for not less than one (1) year.

“Academic year” means the twelve (12) month period beginning with the commencement of the fall semester for the University of Wyoming and with the commencement of the summer semester for community colleges;

“Combat veteran surviving spouse or dependent” means a person who is a surviving spouse or dependent of any overseas combat veteran or Vietnam veteran when the overseas combat veteran or Vietnam veteran was a resident of Wyoming for at least one (1) year prior to entering active service and the overseas combat veteran or Vietnam veteran died during active service. For purposes of this paragraph, a child is a combat dependent only if he was under twenty-two (22) years of age at the time his parent or legal guardian died in overseas combat during active service;

“Overseas combat veteran” means a person other than a Vietnam veteran who was a resident of Wyoming for at least one (1) year prior to entering into active service, who is an honorably discharged veteran who served in the military service of the United States and who was awarded the armed forces expeditionary medal or other authorized service or campaign medal indicating service to the United States in any armed conflict in a foreign country;

“Successive education” means the pursuit of a degree or certificate at a higher level than the student has previously earned using benefits received under this section.

The state or any political educational subdivision shall provide free tuition to all eligible persons who are residents of this state and who are attending or may attend the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college for the purpose of successive education, where courses of instruction are provided in subjects which would tend to enable the eligible persons to engage in any useful trade, occupation or profession. Funds provided under this section shall not exceed the University of Wyoming current undergraduate rate per semester, regardless of the education level, degree or certification a student pursues.

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 3.

The community college commission shall reimburse the University of Wyoming and each community college for the costs of tuition provided under this section. If insufficient funds are appropriated, the reimbursement shall be proportionally reduced based on tuition expenses. The commission shall promulgate rules for the implementation of the free tuition pursuant to subsections (f) through (k) of this section, including the reimbursement to the university and community colleges.

The community college commission shall include within its biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

a report identifying the actions taken and monies expended pursuant to this act for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years.

Any person who is a Vietnam veteran, not presently receiving education benefits under the Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944, as amended, an overseas combat veteran, a combat veteran surviving spouse or a combat veteran dependent shall receive free tuition for up to a total of eight (8) semesters of study at the University of Wyoming or any Wyoming community college. The University of Wyoming and all Wyoming community colleges shall cooperate to ensure that a total of not more than eight (8) semesters is provided under this section to any recipient. No person shall be eligible for the benefits provided under this section for any semester commencing more than eight (8) academic years after the semester in which the person initially receives benefits under this section. The institution in which the student enrolls shall grant exceptions to the requirements of this subsection for military service, religious service or other good cause shown, which exceptions shall be consistent with rules promulgated by the Wyoming department of education for the Hathaway scholarship program under W.S. 21-16-1303(d).

In order to qualify for the benefit under this section, a person claiming eligibility as an overseas combat veteran, combat veteran surviving spouse or combat veteran dependent shall enroll at the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college. A combat veteran dependent shall be under twenty-two (22) years of age at the time of enrollment at the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 92, § 2.

The institution in which the student enrolls shall grant exceptions to the requirements of this section for military service, religious service or other good cause shown, which exceptions shall be consistent with rules promulgated by the Wyoming department of education for the Hathaway scholarship program under W.S. 21-16-1303(b)(iii)(B). There is no limitation as to when a Vietnam veteran not presently receiving education benefits under the Servicemen’s Readjustment Act of 1944, as amended, may enroll and begin receiving benefits under this section. There also is no limit as to when an overseas combat veteran or combat veteran surviving spouse may enroll and begin receiving benefits under this section.

A person who had qualified for free tuition under subsection (f) or (g) of this section, shall be deemed eligible for the free tuition at any Wyoming community college or the University of Wyoming up to the maximum number of semesters of study allowed under subsection (f) of this section, if the person transfers to another institution specified in subsection (b) of this section.

To remain eligible for benefits under this section, by the end of the spring semester completing the student’s third or fourth semester of attendance, the student shall have a cumulative grade point average of at least two point zero (2.0) and shall maintain a cumulative grade point average of at least two point zero (2.0) at the end of each subsequent spring semester to continue to receive the free tuition.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 108, §§ 1, 2; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-210, 30-211; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-125, 19-126; Laws 1969, ch. 187, §§ 1, 2; 1973, ch. 137, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1985, ch. 104, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-6-106

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4; 2005, ch. 71, § 1; 2006, ch. 73, § 1; 2007, ch. 91, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 92, §§ 1, 2; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2018 ch. 109, § 1, effective March 14, 2018.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “eligible person” for “war orphan” or “orphan,” and inserted provisions extending benefits for active state service throughout; in (a)(i) inserted “surviving spouse and” before “child” to similarly extend benefits; in (a)(i)(A) substituted “active state service or active service with the military forces of the United States” for “the Korean or Vietnam conflicts”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendment,

added (a)(iii) through (v); in (c), inserted “overseas combat veteran or combat veteran surviving spouse or orphan” in two places, deleted “or vocational education” following “for any credit,” inserted the last four sentences; added (d) and (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 73, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 23, 2006.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a), substituted “dependent” for “child” in (i); in (iv), substituted “dependent” for “orphan” three times, inserted “or Vietnam veteran” following “veteran” three times, substituted “twenty-two (22)
dependent” for “twenty-one (21)” and inserted “or legal guardian” following “time his parent”; in (d), inserted variants of “and fee” three times, substituted “subsections (f) through (k)” for “subsection (c)”; added (f) through (k), and repealed former (c), which pertained to providing free tuition for any Vietnam veteran not presently receiving education benefits under the Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944.

Laws 2007, ch. 91, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 22, 2007.

The 2012 amendment,

in (g), added “an overseas combat veteran, combat veteran surviving spouse or combat veteran dependent shall enroll at the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college,” and the last sentence; repealed former (g)(i) through (g)(iii) pertaining to removing time limits for receiving certain educational benefits; and in (h), substituted “section” for “subsection,” and added the present last sentence.

Laws 2012, ch. 92, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2014 amendment,

rewrote (e).

The 2018 amendment,

throughout (d), (f), (j), and (k), deleted “and fees” and variants following “tuition”; added (a)(vi); in (b), in the first sentence, deleted “matriculation and all other fees” following “free tuition” and substituted “the University of Wyoming or a Wyoming community college for the purpose of successive education” for “any state institutions in elementary, secondary and college grades, business colleges, state vocational training schools or other educational institutions of this state,” and added the second sentence; in (f), twice substituted “eight (8)” for “ten (10)” preceding “semesters”; and, in (j),substituted “subsection (f)” for “subsection (a)” following “allowed under” and “subsection (b)” for “subsection (a)” following specified in.”

Laws 2018, ch. 109, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 14, 2018.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2018, ch. 109, § 2, provides: “Notwithstanding
W.S.

19-14-106

as amended by this act, students receiving initial benefits before the effective date of this act, shall be eligible for free tuition and fees for up to a total of ten (10) semesters if such benefits are exercised before August 31, 2020. Students receiving benefits subject to this section may continue work in the certificate or degree based program in which they are currently enrolled regardless of successive education or University of Wyoming undergraduate rate requirements.”

Servicemen's Readjustment Act. —

The federal Servicemen's Readjustment Act of 1944, referred to in subsection (c), was repealed in 1958 and reenacted as 38 U.S.C. § 3701 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

The term “this act,” referred to in this section, means
§§

19-14-101

through

19-14-109

.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2006, ch. 73, § 2 appropriates from the general fund to the community college commission two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00) for reimbursement to the University of Wyoming and the community colleges to cover the free tuition authorized under this act. The community college commission is authorized to take an administrative fee, not to exceed five percent (5%), to administer and disburse the funds pursuant to this act. Notwithstanding W.S.14 9-4-207(a), any unexpended funds appropriated under this section shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.

§ 19-14-107.
Creation of veterans' commission; composition; terms.

A Wyoming veterans’ commission is created within the military department consisting of twelve (12) members, not less than one (1) of whom shall reside in each judicial district identified in W.S.

5-3-101

, appointed by the governor for staggered terms of three (3) years. Commencing with initial appointments made in 2005, four (4) members of the board shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year, four (4) members for a term of two (2) years and four (4) members for a term of three (3) years. Terms thereafter shall be three (3) years and staggered with one-third (1/3) of the members’ terms expiring each year. Appointments shall be made without regard to political affiliation, sex, religion or ethnic background. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. A chairman shall be elected by the commission from among its members and a new chairman elected every two (2) years thereafter.

The commission shall meet at least once a year and at the call of the governor. Members shall be reimbursed according to W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

The commission shall:

Study all federal and state legislation affecting veterans, their spouses, dependents and beneficiaries;

Establish liaison with agencies dealing with veteran’s affairs;

Make recommendations to the legislature and to the governor concerning veterans;

Adopt policies and procedures necessary to administer the veteran burial team account pursuant to W.S.

19-14-109

;

Prepare, maintain and distribute information, by printed material or otherwise, to educate Wyoming veterans and their families regarding veterans’ benefits, healthcare and disability claims, pension claims and other matters relevant to veteran status;

Provide oversight and administrative services for the operation of any veterans’ cemetery authorized by W.S.

19-14-108

, including but not limited to establishing cemetery directors and advisory boards;

Provide assistance to Wyoming veterans and their families for the filing and processing of veterans’ benefits, veterans’ healthcare benefits and United States Department of Veterans Affairs disability and pension claims;

Administer all vehicle licensing and driver’s licensing obligations required of the commission pursuant to title 31;

Maintain and administer the veterans’ commission expendable trust fund pursuant to rules and procedures which shall be promulgated by the commission and approved by the military department;

To the extent the employment of an executive director would aid in accomplishing the duties required by this section and benefit Wyoming veterans, appoint or retain an executive director for such period, upon such terms and conditions and for such compensation as the commission may deem appropriate. Any appointment shall be made with the approval of the adjutant general and the governor and shall be subject to the removal authority provided by W.S.

9-1-202

. An executive director may hire and supervise such other staff as may be authorized by the commission and shall be administratively supported by the military department;

Collect, maintain and preserve physically or electronically any military service records of past and present Wyoming national guard personnel and those veterans who have declared Wyoming as their residence upon separation from the military. This shall include any records maintained by the adjutant general pursuant to W.S. 19-7-103(b)(iii) and (xiv) if delegated such responsibility;

Perform such other and further tasks as are necessary to carry out the duties imposed by this section or as required by the legislature.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 127, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1986, ch. 39, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

19-6-107

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 1999, ch. 57, § 1; 2003, ch. 55, § 1; ch. 181, § 2; 2004, ch. 39, § 1; 2005, ch. 36, § 1; 2011, ch. 27, § 1; 2013 ch. 199, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 47, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (c)(iv), substituted “policies and procedures” for “rules and regulations.”

Laws 2004, ch. 39, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), substituted “staggered terms of three (3) years” for “terms of two (2) years,” and inserted the second and third sentences.

The 2011 amendment,

added (c)(v) through (c)(xi) and made related changes.

Laws 2011, ch. 27 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2011.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added present (c)(xi), and redesignated former (c)(xi) as (c)(xii).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “and driver’s licensing” in (c)(viii).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2004, ch. 39, § 2, provides:

“(a)

The policies and procedures adopted by the veterans' commission pursuant to this act shall not be subject to provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [W.S.

16-3-101

et seq].

“(b)

The provisions of this act shall apply to claims payable under W.S.

19-14-109

for services rendered on or after July 1, 2003.”

Veterans home study. —

Laws 2005, ch. 199, §§ 1 and 2, appropriates $100,000, or so much thereof as is necessary, from the general fund to the Wyoming veterans commission who, with the support of and in cooperation with the department of health and the state building commission, is to develop a master plan for the residential and nonresidential care of disabled Wyoming veterans. The commission is to study current and projected populations of disabled veterans and develop a plan for addressing the long term health care needs of the disabled veteran community. The study is to determine whether or not an additional veterans' nursing home should be established and is to consider existing services in community nursing homes available to the veteran population. If the study results indicate the need for establishment of a veterans' nursing home, the commission is to develop a master plan for the proposed facility, which considers potential funding sources for a state veterans' home, alternatives to construction of a new facility and potential sites for a state veterans' home. The commission is to report its written findings and recommendations to the joint labor, health and social services interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee on or before October 1, 2005.

Laws 2005, ch. 199, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

§ 19-14-108.
Veterans' cemetery; acquisition and maintenance; eligibility for burial.

Military department, with the approval of the veterans’ commission, may acquire a site in this state to be used to establish a cemetery for the interment of veterans of the United States armed forces and for qualified family members of eligible veterans. The approval of the local governing body of the county in which the proposed site is located shall be obtained prior to any acquisition of land for this purpose. The department, with the approval of the commission, is empowered to receive any lands granted to the state or any of its political subdivisions. All military cemeteries currently owned by the state of Wyoming shall be operated and controlled by the military department.

The military department shall supervise and control a veterans’ cemetery established under this section. All personnel, equipment and support necessary for maintenance and operation of the cemetery shall be included in the budget of the military department. All employees shall be under the state personnel system.

Any veteran who received any discharge, other than a dishonorable discharge, from the armed forces of the United States is eligible for burial in the state veterans’ cemetery and any indigent veteran shall be buried in the cemetery without charge except that any funds that are made available from the veteran’s administration and the social security burial allowance shall be paid to the cemetery director. Such funds collected shall be applied to the cemetery for capital improvements, operations or maintenance and shall not be paid to the general fund of the state.

Any eligible veteran, qualified family member, or the survivors of an eligible veteran or qualified family member, or a county under W.S.

19-14-101

, in the veteran’s behalf, may apply for a burial plot in the state veterans’ cemetery by submitting a request to the cemetery director on forms supplied by the military department and available from the cemetery director. The department, in consultation with the commission, shall allot available burial plots on a first come, first served basis. There shall be no charge made for any burial plot. There shall be no charge for the interment of any eligible veteran. The director of the Oregon Trail veteran’s cemetery shall apply to the veterans administration for payment of any allowable plot or interment allowance.

A spouse or a handicapped or minor child of a veteran who qualifies for burial as provided in subsection (c) of this section may also qualify for burial in the state veterans’ cemetery, if the interment of the qualified family member is in the same burial plot as that provided for the veteran and the interment is either above or below the veteran. The department, in consultation with the commission, shall establish a fee schedule which may be adjusted from time to time for burial of family members. The fees shall cover as nearly as practicable the actual costs of interments. The department, in consultation with the commission, may accept the social security burial allowance, if any, of the qualified family member in an amount not to exceed the actual cost of the interment.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 69, § 1; 1982, ch. 53, § 1; 1985, ch. 79, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; ch. 63, § 2; 1991, ch. 40, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-6-108

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 55, § 1; 2019 ch. 48, § 1, effective February 18, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

in (c), substituted “that any funds that are made” for “such funds as may be,” following “except,” deleted “if any” following “burial allowance” and inserted “operations or maintenance” following “for capital improvements.”

Laws 2019, ch. 48, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2019.

Temporary provisions. —

Laws 2004, ch. 71, § 1, appropriates $19,450 from the general fund to the adjutant general for the development of a master plan for the Oregon Trail state veteran's cemetery, which is to be developed in accordance with federal requirements to allow for reimbursement of expenditures for the development, expansion and operation of the cemetery. The plan should recommend appropriate means to allow disabled persons to visit grave sites. To the extent reimbursement is available, the adjutant general is to apply to appropriate federal agencies for reimbursement of expenditures for the development of the master plan. Any reimbursement of expenditures made under this section will be deposited with the state treasurer to be placed in the general fund. Section 2 of the act requires the adjutant general to report to the joint transportation and highways interim committee not later than September 15, 2004, regarding the development of the master plan, which report should include a timeline for future expansion and development, anticipated costs for each phase of expansion and development and the available funding sources for expansion and development.

Laws 2004, ch. 71, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2004.